Utah statutes.
34A-2-418.   Awards -- Medical, nursing, hospital, and burial expenses --
Artificial means and appliances.
(1)  In addition to the compensation provided in this chapter or Chapter 3,
Utah Occupational Disease Act, the employer or the insurance carrier shall pay
reasonable sums for medical, nurse, and hospital services, for medicines, and
for artificial means, appliances, and prostheses necessary to treat the
injured employee.
(2)  If death results from the injury, the employer or the insurance carrier
shall pay the burial expenses in ordinary cases as established by rule.
(3)  If a compensable accident results in the breaking of or loss of an
employee's artificial means or appliance including eyeglasses, the employer or
insurance carrier shall provide a replacement of the artificial means or
appliance.
(4) An administrative law judge may require the employer or insurance carrier
to maintain the artificial means or appliances or provide the employee with a
replacement of any artificial means or appliance for the reason of breakage,
wear and tear, deterioration, or obsolescence.
(5) An administrative law judge may, in unusual cases, order, as the
administrative law judge considers just and proper, the payment of additional
sums:
(a)  for burial expenses; or
(b)  to provide for artificial means or appliances.
